Utah statutes.
53A-11-1208.   Use of school facilities by clubs.

(1)  A school shall determine and assign school facilities use for curricular and noncurricular clubs consistent with the needs of the school.

(2)  The following rules apply to curricular clubs:

(a)  in assigning school facilities use, the administrator may give priority to curricular clubs over noncurricular clubs; and

(b)  the school may provide financial or other support to curricular clubs.

(3)  The following rules apply to noncurricular clubs:

(a)  a preference or priority may not be given among noncurricular clubs;

(b) (i)  a school shall only provide the space for noncurricular club meetings; and

(ii)  a school may not spend public funds for noncurricular clubs, except as required to implement the provisions of this part, including providing space and faculty oversight for noncurricular clubs;

(c)  a school shall establish the noninstructional times during which noncurricular clubs may meet;

(d)  a school may establish the places that noncurricular clubs may meet;

(e)  a school may set the number of hours noncurricular clubs may use the school's facilities per month, provided that all noncurricular clubs shall be treated equally; and

(f)  a school shall determine what access noncurricular clubs shall be given to the school newspaper, yearbook, bulletin boards, or public address system, provided that all noncurricular clubs shall be treated equally.



Amended by Chapter 403, 2011 General Session

